pt-BR: Localização da porta de carregamento: Centro dianteiro; Dianteira esquerda; Dianteira direita; Meio esquerda; Meio direita; Centro traseiro; Traseira esquerda; Traseira direita; Outro
de: Position des Ladeanschlusses: Vorne mittig; Vorne links; Vorne rechts; Mitte links; Mitte rechts; Hinten mittig; Hinten links; Hinten rechts; Sonstiges
ko: 충전 포트 위치: 전면 중앙; 전면 좌측; 전면 우측; 중간 좌측; 중간 우측; 후면 중앙; 후면 좌측; 후면 우측; 기타
nb: Lading portsted: Foran i midten; Foran til venstre; Foran til høyre; Midten til venstre; Midten til høyre; Bak i midten; Bak til venstre; Bak til høyre; Annet
ru: Расположение зарядного порта: Спереди по центру; Спереди слева; Спереди справа; Посередине слева; Посередине справа; Сзади по центру; Сзади слева; Сзади справа; Другое
da: Ladeportens placering: Foran i midten; Forrest til venstre; Forrest til højre; Midt til venstre; Midt til højre; Bagved i midten; Bagerst til venstre; Bagerst til højre; Andet
en: Charging port location: Front center; Front left; Front right; Mid left; Mid right; Rear center; Rear left; Rear right; Other
ro-RO: Locația portului de încărcare: Centru față; Stânga față; Dreapta față; Mijloc stânga; Mijloc dreapta; Centru spate; Stânga spate; Dreapta spate; Altele
pt-PT: Localização da porta de carregamento: Frente ao centro; Frente à esquerda; Frente à direita; Meio à esquerda; Meio à direita; Trás ao centro; Trás à esquerda; Trás à direita; Outra
nl: Laadpoort locatie: Voor midden; Voor links; Voor rechts; Midden links; Midden rechts; Achter midden; Achter links; Achter rechts; Overig
sk-SK: Umiestnenie nabíjacieho portu: Vpredu uprostred; Vpredu vľavo; Vpredu vpravo; Uprostred vľavo; Uprostred vpravo; Vzadu uprostred; Vzadu vľavo; Vzadu vpravo; Iné
sv: Laddningsportens placering: Fram mitten; Fram vänster; Fram höger; Mitten vänster; Mitten höger; Bak mitten; Bak vänster; Bak höger; Övrigt
hu: Töltőcsatlakozó elhelyezkedése: Elöl középen; Elöl balra; Elöl jobbra; Középen balra; Középen jobbra; Hátul középen; Hátul balra; Hátul jobbra; Egyéb
fr: Emplacement du port de charge: Avant centre; Avant gauche; Avant droit; Milieu gauche; Milieu droit; Arrière centre; Arrière gauche; Arrière droit; Autre
th: ตำแหน่งพอร์ตชาร์จไฟ: ด้านหน้าตรงกลาง; ด้านหน้าซ้าย; ด้านหน้าขวา; ตรงกลางซ้าย; ตรงกลางขวา; ด้านหลังตรงกลาง; ด้านหลังซ้าย; ด้านหลังขวา; อื่นๆ
it: Porta Charge sede: Anteriore centrale; Anteriore sinistro; Anteriore destro; Centrale sinistro; Centrale destro; Posteriore centrale; Posteriore sinistro; Posteriore destro; Altro
zh-TW: 充電埠位置: 前中; 左前; 右前; 中左; 中右; 後中; 左後; 右後; 其他
lt-LT: Įkrovimo prievado vieta: Priekyje viduryje; Priekyje kairėje; Priekyje dešinėje; Viduryje kairėje; Viduryje dešinėje; Gale viduryje; Gale kairėje; Gale dešinėje; Kita
cs: Umístění nabíjecího portu: Vpředu uprostřed; Vpředu vlevo; Vpředu vpravo; Uprostřed vlevo; Uprostřed vpravo; Vzadu uprostřed; Vzadu vlevo; Vzadu vpravo; Jiné
hr-HR: Lokacija luke za utovar: Sprijeda u sredini; Sprijeda lijevo; Sprijeda desno; Sredina lijevo; Sredina desno; Straga u sredini; Straga lijevo; Straga desno; Ostalo
zh-CN: 充电口位置: 正前方; 左前方; 右前方; 左侧中部; 右侧中部; 正后方; 左后方; 右后方; 其他
tr: Şarj portu konumu: Ön orta; Ön sol; Ön sağ; Orta sol; Orta sağ; Arka orta; Arka sol; Arka sağ; Diğer
el: Τοποθεσία θύρας φόρτισης: Εμπρός κέντρο; Εμπρός αριστερά; Εμπρός δεξιά; Μέση αριστερά; Μέση δεξιά; Πίσω κέντρο; Πίσω αριστερά; Πίσω δεξιά; Άλλο
vi: Vị trí cổng sạc: Giữa phía trước; Trái phía trước; Phải phía trước; Trái ở giữa; Phải ở giữa; Giữa phía sau; Trái phía sau; Phải phía sau; Khác
es: Ubicación del puerto de carga: Centro delantero; Delantero izquierdo; Delantero derecho; Medio izquierdo; Medio derecho; Trasero central; Trasero izquierdo; Trasero derecho; Otro
bg-BG: Местоположение на порта за зареждане: Отпред в средата; Отпред вляво; Отпред вдясно; В средата вляво; В средата вдясно; Отзад в средата; Отзад вляво; Отзад вдясно; Други
fi: Latausportin sijainti: Edessä keskellä; Edessä vasemmalla; Edessä oikealla; Keskellä vasemmalla; Keskellä oikealla; Takana keskellä; Takana vasemmalla; Takana oikealla; Muu
sl-SI: Lokacija priključka za polnjenje: Spredaj na sredini; Spredaj levo; Spredaj desno; Sredina levo; Sredina desno; Zadaj na sredini; Zadaj levo; Zadaj desno; Drugo
ja: Chargeポートの位置: 前面中央; 前面左; 前面右; 側面左中央; 側面右中央; 背面中央; 背面左; 背面右; その他
pl: Lokalizacja portu ładowania: Z przodu na środku; Z przodu po lewej; Z przodu po prawej; Środek po lewej; Środek po prawej; Z tyłu na środku; Z tyłu po lewej; Z tyłu po prawej; Inne